Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 85. Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to allocations of tax credit and bonding limits imposed by the federal government under P.L. 111-5 (American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009), to the waiver of volume cap of recovery zone economic development bonds, and to the ability of the bond bank authority to reallocate economic development bonds affected that waived volume cap, see § 5, ch. 68, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.
For a statement of the findings and purpose that applies to that section, see § 1, ch. 68, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal bond bank authority, see 15 AAC 144.

Sec. 44.85.005.
Legislative findings.

The legislature finds that

the rapid growth of municipalities in the state and the incorporation of new municipalities has created a demand for capital improvements that can only be met by these municipalities borrowing money through the issuance of bonds or notes;

many of these municipalities, although creditworthy, either have not issued bonds or notes or have little outstanding debt;

the cost of borrowed money to these municipalities is or may be unnecessarily high due to lack of investor familiarity with the municipalities;

other municipalities in the state pay unnecessarily high borrowing costs because of the distance of the state from capital markets or may find borrowing difficult or impossible because of temporary economic dislocation due to loss of employment or prospective loss of employment;

the University of Alaska has limited debt capacity and may pay higher interest rates because of lower credit ratings;

many municipalities provide for or partner with nonprofit organizations to provide for delivery of health care;

nonprofit regional health organizations deliver services in many locations where municipal partners are unavailable;

joint action agencies require financial assistance for public utility projects, including hydroelectric power projects, that benefit municipalities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.005. Renumbered in 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal bond bank authority, see 15 AAC 144.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 18, 2014, added (5), and made a related change.

The 2015 amendment, effective May 27, 2015, added (6) - (8).

Sec. 44.85.010.
Legislative policy.

It is the policy of the state to

foster and promote by all reasonable means the provision of adequate capital markets and facilities for borrowing money by municipalities in the state to finance capital improvements or for other authorized purposes, to assist these municipalities in fulfilling their capital needs and requirements by use of borrowed money within statutory interest rate or cost of borrowing limitations, to the greatest extent possible to reduce costs of borrowed money to taxpayers and residents of the state, and equally to encourage continued investor interest in the purchase of bonds or notes of municipalities as sound and preferred securities for investment;

encourage municipalities to continue their independent undertakings and financing of capital improvements and other authorized purposes and to assist them by making capital funds available at reduced interest costs for orderly financing of capital improvements and other purposes especially during periods of restricted credit or money supply, particularly for those municipalities not otherwise able to borrow for capital needs;

assist municipalities to provide for adequate insurance coverage by authorizing the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority to issue negotiable or nonnegotiable revenue bonds, notes, or certificates of participation either directly or through an entity it may create for the purpose of providing a self-insurance program for municipalities or municipal joint insurance arrangements organized under AS 21.76;

assist governmental employers to prepay all or a portion of their share of unfunded accrued actuarial liabilities of retirement systems in an effort to reduce their costs of satisfying their contractual obligations to provide retirement and other benefits to public employees through the issuance of bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations by the bond bank authority or by a subsidiary corporation created by the bond bank authority under AS

44.85.085

, but only after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee and if the state bond rating is the equivalent of AA- or better; this assistance is limited as provided in AS

37.15.903

;

assist the University of Alaska to provide heating or energy projects by providing capital funds through loans that minimize costs and the effects on the debt capacity of the University of Alaska;

assist regional health organizations to provide health care facilities by providing capital funds through loans that minimize costs and the effects on the debt capacity of regional health organizations when the commissioner of health and social services anticipates a state financial benefit and an increase in regional quality of care;

assist joint action agencies in providing public utilities, including hydroelectric power projects, through loans and bonds that minimize costs and the effects on the debt capacity of public utilities and joint action agencies.

The legislature further declares that

the exercise of the powers of the state in the interest of its municipalities and in the interest of public employees of the state and of its municipalities is required to further and implement the policies declared in (a) of this section by authorizing the creation of a state bond bank authority as a body corporate and politic that will have full powers to borrow money and to issue its bonds and notes to make capital funds available for borrowing by municipalities and for borrowing by or on behalf of governmental employers, by authorizing governmental employers to contract with the bond bank authority or with a subsidiary created under AS

44.85.085

for the purpose of reducing future costs of providing retirement and other benefits to employees, and by granting broad powers to the bond bank authority to carry out the declared policies, which are in the public interest of the state and its taxpayers and residents;

state funds should be applied or authorized to be paid to a state bond bank authority only to provide adequate assurance and security to the holders of the bonds or notes of the bond bank authority;

the bond bank authority should conduct its operations to provide the lowest rates in terms of borrowing to municipalities as is consistent with a self-supporting operation with no expectation of subsidization with state funds; the legislature does not intend that the bond bank authority be utilized as a means to finance municipalities beyond their capability to meet repayment schedules and debt service requirements of bonds or notes;

the bond bank authority or its subsidiary should conduct its operations to provide the lowest rates in terms of borrowing to governmental employers under AS

44.85.085

and

44.85.086

as is consistent with a self-supporting operation with no expectation of subsidization with state funds; the legislature does not intend that the bond bank authority or its subsidiary be utilized as a means to finance governmental employers under AS 44.85.085 and

44.85.086

beyond their capability to meet repayment schedules and debt service requirements of bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations to the bond bank authority or its subsidiary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 85 SLA 1989; am § 13 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 2015; am § 8 ch 109 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.010. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in connection with the enactment of (a)(3) of this section, see § 1, ch. 85, SLA 1989 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal bond bank authority, see 15 AAC 144.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 18, 2014, added (a)(5), and made a related change.

The 2015 amendment, effective May 27, 2015, added (a)(6) and (a)(7).

The 2018 amendment, effective December 26, 2018, in (a)(4), inserted “after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee and” following “but only”.

Sec. 44.85.020.
Municipal Bond Bank Authority.

There is created the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority. The authority is a public corporation of the state.
The corporation is an instrumentality of the state within the Department of Revenue but has a legal existence independent of and separate from the state and has continuing succession until its existence is terminated by law.
The exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by this chapter is considered an essential governmental function of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.020. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.030.
Membership and vacancies.

The bond bank authority consists of the following five directors: the commissioner of revenue, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development, who shall each be a director ex officio with voting privileges, and three directors appointed by the governor. The appointment of each director other than the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development is subject to confirmation by the legislature. The three directors appointed by the governor serve at the governor’s pleasure for four-year terms. They must be residents of the state and qualified voters at the time of appointment and shall comply with the requirements of AS 39.50 (public official financial disclosure). Each director shall hold office for the term of appointment and until a successor has been appointed and qualified. A director is eligible for reappointment. A vacancy in a directorship occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment but for the unexpired term only. Each director before entering upon the duties of office shall take and subscribe to an oath to perform the duties faithfully, impartially, and justly to the best of the director’s ability. A record of the oath shall be filed in the office of the governor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 35 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 19 ch 33 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.030. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in this section, “community and regional affairs” was changed to “community and economic development” in accordance with § 91(a)(12), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.85.040.
Officers, quorum, and meetings.

The directors shall elect one of their number as chairman. The directors shall elect a secretary and a treasurer who need not be directors, and the same person may be elected to serve both as secretary and treasurer. The powers of the bond bank authority are vested in the directors, and three directors of the bond bank authority constitute a quorum. Action may be taken and motions and resolutions adopted by the bond bank authority at any meeting by the affirmative vote of at least three directors. A vacancy in the directorship of the bond bank authority does not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the bond bank authority.

The bond bank authority may meet and transact business by an electronic medium if (1) public notice of the time and locations where the meeting will be held by an electronic medium has been given in the same manner as if the meeting were held in a single location; (2) participants and members of the public in attendance can hear and have the same right to participate in the meeting as if the meeting were conducted in person; and (3) copies of pertinent reference materials, statutes, regulations, and audio-visual materials are reasonably available to participants and to the public. A meeting by an electronic medium as provided in this subsection has the same legal effect as a meeting in person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.040. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.050.
Bonding of members.

Before the issuance of bonds or notes under this chapter, each director shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum of $25,000 and the treasurer shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum of $50,000. Each surety bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office of the director or treasurer, to be executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in the state as surety and filed in the office of the lieutenant governor. After issuance of bonds or notes by the bond bank authority each director shall maintain the surety bond in force.
All costs of the surety bonds shall be borne by the bond bank authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.050. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.060.
Compensation and expenses.

The directors of the bond bank authority shall serve without compensation, but the bond bank authority shall reimburse its directors for actual expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties. Notwithstanding any other law, an officer or employee of the state need not forfeit office or employment or any benefits by reason of acceptance of appointment to the office of director of the bond bank authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.060. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.070.
Staff.

The bond bank authority shall employ an executive secretary who may with the approval of the bond bank authority select and employ additional staff as necessary. Employees and agents of the bond bank authority other than legal counsel and the executive secretary are in the classified service under AS 39.25.
In addition to its staff of regular employees, the bond bank authority may contract for and engage the services of the bond counsel, consultants, experts, and financial advisors the bond bank authority considers necessary for the purpose of developing information, or conducting studies, investigations, hearings, or other proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.070. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.080.
Powers of bond bank authority.

The bond bank authority may

sue and be sued;

adopt and alter an official seal;

make and enforce bylaws and regulations for the conduct of its business and for the use of its services and facilities;

maintain an office at any place in the state;

acquire, hold, use, and dispose of its income, revenues, funds, and money;

acquire, rent, lease, hold, use, and dispose of other personal property for its purposes;

subject to AS

44.85.100(b)

, borrow money and issue its negotiable bonds or notes and provide for and secure their payment, provide for the rights of their holders, and purchase, hold, and dispose of any of its bonds or notes;

fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect fees and charges for the use of its services or facilities;

accept gifts or grants from the United States, or from any governmental unit or person, firm, or corporation, carry out the terms or provisions or make agreements with respect to the gifts or grants, and do all things necessary, useful, desirable, or convenient in connection with procuring, accepting, or disposing of the gifts or grants;

do anything authorized by this chapter, through its officers, agents, or employees or by contracts with a person;

make, enter into, and enforce all contracts necessary, convenient, or desirable for the purposes of the bond bank authority or pertaining to a loan, a purchase or sale of municipal bonds or other investments, or the performance of its duties and execution of any of its powers under this chapter;

purchase or hold municipal bonds at prices and in a manner the bond bank authority considers advisable, and sell municipal bonds acquired or held by it at prices without relation to cost and in a manner the bond bank authority considers advisable;

invest funds or money of the bond bank authority not required at the time of investment for loans or for the purchase of municipal bonds, in the same manner as permitted for investment of funds belonging to the state, except as otherwise provided in this chapter;

prescribe the form of application or procedure required for a loan or purchase of its municipal bonds, fix the terms and conditions of the loan or purchase, and enter into agreements with respect to loans or purchases;

render services in connection with a public or private sale of its municipal bonds, including advisory and other services, and charge for services rendered;

charge for its costs and services in review or consideration of a proposed loan or purchase by the bond bank authority of municipal bonds, whether or not the loan is made or the municipal bonds purchased;

fix and establish terms and provisions with respect to a purchase of municipal bonds by the bond bank authority, including date and maturities of the bonds, provisions as to redemption or payment before maturity, and any other matters that in connection with the purchase are necessary, desirable, or advisable in the judgment of the bond bank authority;

procure insurance against any losses in connection with its property, operations, or assets in amounts and from insurers as it considers desirable;

to the extent permitted under its contracts with the holders of bonds or notes of the bond bank authority, consent to modification of the rate of interest, time and payment of installment of principal or interest, security or any other term of a bond or note, contract or agreement of any kind to which the bond bank authority is a party;

by regulation, create a new entity or new entities for the purpose of issuing negotiable or nonnegotiable revenue bonds, notes, or certificates of participation to finance a self-insurance program for municipalities or municipal joint insurance arrangements organized under AS 21.76 or to provide assistance to governmental employers under AS

44.85.085(a)

; the powers, duties, and membership of the new entity or entities shall be limited to the powers, duties, and membership of the authority and stated in the regulation; the new entity or entities shall each be a public corporation and an instrumentality of the state with the same legal existence and continuing succession as the bond bank authority; and

do all acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 38 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 85 SLA 1989; am §§ 8, 9 ch 115 SLA 1989; am § 14 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 28 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.080.
Renumbered in 1980.
Paragraph (20) was enacted as (21). Paragraph (21) was enacted as (20); renumbered in 1989 as (22); renumbered again in 1993 when former (21) was repealed.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal bond bank authority, see 15 AAC 144.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, in paragraph (20), inserted “or new entities,” “or to provide assistance to governmental employers under AS

44.85.085(a)

,” “or entities” two times, and “each,” and made a stylistic change in paragraph (17).

The 2015 amendment, effective May 27, 2015, in (11), deleted “to a political subdivision” following “pertaining to a loan”; in (13), substituted “investment for loans or” for “investment for loan to political subdivisions”; in (14), deleted “of a political subdivision” following “or procedure required” and “with political subdivisions” following “enter into agreements”; in (15), deleted “to a political subdivision” following “render services”; in (16), deleted “to a political subdivision” following “consideration of a proposed loan” and “of the political subdivision” following “authority of municipal bonds”.

Sec. 44.85.085.
Creation of subsidiary corporation.

The bond bank authority may create one or more subsidiary corporations for the following purposes:

providing financial and other assistance to governmental employers to enable the governmental employers to reduce their costs of providing retirement and other benefits to their employees by prepaying all or a portion of their shares of the unfunded accrued actuarial liabilities of retirement systems;

receiving payments and providing servicing for payments to or from participating governmental employers; and

performing other duties and providing other services as the subsidiary corporation considers necessary or desirable to further the purposes set out in (1) and (2) of this subsection.

The bond bank authority may incorporate under AS

10.20.146

—

10.20.166

a subsidiary corporation created under (a) of this section. The bond bank authority may transfer assets of the bond bank authority to the subsidiary corporation and may agree to secure bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations of the subsidiary corporation with a reserve fund established under AS

44.85.270

.

A subsidiary corporation created under (a) of this section may, after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under (e) of this section, if the state bond rating is the equivalent of AA- or better, and subject to AS

37.15.903

, borrow money and issue bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations as evidence of that borrowing and may have all the powers of the bond bank authority that the bond bank authority grants to it. The provisions of AS

44.85.130

—

44.85.170

and

44.85.270

—

44.85.390

apply to the subsidiary corporation and to bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations issued by the subsidiary corporation. Unless otherwise provided by the bond bank authority, the debts, liabilities, and obligations of the subsidiary corporation are not the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the bond bank authority.

The staff of the bond bank authority serves as staff of a subsidiary corporation created under (a) of this section. The bond bank authority shall determine the membership or the process for selecting the membership of the board of directors of the subsidiary corporation. The bond bank authority may permit some or all of its directors to serve on the board of directors of the subsidiary corporation.

Before the issuance of bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations under this section or under AS

44.85.086

, the subsidiary corporation shall submit a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee for review, and 45 days shall elapse before bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations are issued, unless the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee earlier recommends that the subsidiary corporation proceed with the issuance. Should the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee recommend within the 45-day period that the subsidiary corporation not proceed with the issuance of bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations, the subsidiary corporation shall again review the proposal, and, if the subsidiary corporation decides to issue the bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations, the subsidiary corporation shall provide the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee with a statement of the subsidiary corporation’s reasons for doing so before issuance under this section.

History.

(§ 15 ch 35 SLA 2008; am §§
9, 10 ch 109 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective December 26, 2018, in (c), in the first sentence, inserted “after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under (e) of this section,” preceding “if the state bond rating”; added (e).

Sec. 44.85.086.
Powers of subsidiary corporation.

A subsidiary corporation created under AS

44.85.085

has the following powers in addition to those granted to it under AS

44.85.085

(c):

to make loans to and enter into contracts with governmental employers;

to incur debt, subject to AS

37.15.903

, in furtherance of its purposes, in the form of bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations as the subsidiary corporation considers appropriate, but only after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under AS

44.85.085(e)

and if the state bond rating is the equivalent of AA- or better;

to secure its debt with a pledge of any assets that are available to the subsidiary corporation for the purpose, including identified revenue and contractual payments from participating governmental employers, and the general assets and revenue of the subsidiary corporation; and

to enter into contracts with underwriters, bond counsel, financial advisors, accountants, actuaries, and other contractors to provide assistance as the subsidiary corporation considers desirable to accomplish its purposes.

History.

(§ 15 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 11 ch 109 SLA 2018)

The 2018 amendment, effective December 26, 2018, in (2), inserted “after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under AS

44.85.085(e)

and” following “but only”.

Sec. 44.85.090.
Limitations.

Under this chapter, the bond bank authority may not

make loans of money to a person, firm, or corporation except as provided in this chapter;

emit bills of credit, accept deposits of money for time or demand deposit, administer trusts, or engage in any form or manner in, or in the conduct of, a private or commercial banking business, or act as a savings bank or savings and loan association;

be or constitute a bank or trust company within the jurisdiction or under the control of a regulatory or supervisory board or department of the state, or the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States, or the Department of the Treasury, or Federal Reserve Board of the United States;

be or constitute a bank, banker, or dealer in securities within the meaning of or subject to the provisions of securities, securities exchange, or securities dealers law, of the United States or of this state or of another state; or

issue bonds or notes to a regional health organization unless

the bond bank authority finances not more than 49 percent of a project;

the remaining costs of a project are secured or delivered to the bond bank authority before the bond bank authority provides financing under (A) of this paragraph; and

the bonds or notes do not exceed $102,500,000 for a single project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.090. Renumbered in 1980.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 18, 2014, in (1), inserted “or the University of Alaska” following “other than a municipality”.

The 2015 amendment, effective May 27, 2015, in (1), substituted “or corporation except” for “or corporation other than a municipality or the University of Alaska or purchase securities issued by a person, other than a municipality except for investment”; added (5), and made related changes.

Sec. 44.85.095.
Regulations.

The bond bank authority shall adopt regulations, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 39 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.58.095. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For provision giving legislative approval required under (g) of this section for the issuance of bonds to finance the infrastructure and construction costs of the Bokan-Dotson Ridge rare earth element project, see sec. 5, ch. 20, SLA 2014, in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision giving legislative approval required under (g) of this section for the issuance of bonds to finance the infrastructure and construction costs of the Niblack project, including mineral processing mill, associated dock, and loading and related infrastructure facilities at the Gravina Island Industrial Complex, as well as infrastructure at the project site on Prince of Wales Island, see sec. 6, ch. 20, SLA 2014, in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal bond bank authority, see 15 AAC 144.

Sec. 44.85.100.
Annual report and audit.

Before October 1 of each year the bond bank authority shall make a report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year to the governor and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report shall set out a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year. The bond bank authority must have an audit of its books and accounts made at least once in each year by certified public accountants and the cost of the audit shall be considered an expense of the bond bank authority and a copy of the audit shall be filed with the commissioner of revenue and the legislature.

The bond bank authority shall include in the report required by (a) of this section an estimate of the amount of revenue bonds of the bond bank authority to be issued during the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the report is submitted. Other than refunding bonds and other than bonds, notes, commercial paper, or other obligations issued under AS

44.85.086

,

44.85.180(a)(5)

, and

44.85.180(e)

, the bond bank authority may not issue revenue bonds in excess of $75,000,000 during any fiscal year beginning after June 30, 1981, unless the legislature, by law, approves the estimate required by this subsection for that fiscal year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 40 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 1983; am § 100 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2003; am § 16 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.100. Renumbered in 1980.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 18, 2014, in (b), inserted “and 44.85.180(e),” preceding “the bond bank authority” and made a related change.

Sec. 44.85.110.
Annual budget.

The bond bank authority shall prepare and submit an annual budget under AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.110. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.120.
Care and custody of bonds.

The bond bank authority, in accordance with AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code), may enter into agreements or contracts with a bank, trust company, banking or financial institution inside or outside the state as may be necessary, desirable, or convenient, in the opinion of the bond bank authority, for rendering services in connection with the care, custody, or safekeeping of municipal bonds or other investments held or owned by the bond bank authority, for rendering services in connection with the payment or collection of amounts payable as to principal or interest, and for rendering services in connection with the delivery to the bond bank authority of municipal bonds or other investments purchased by it or sold by it, and to pay the cost of those services. The bond bank authority may also, in connection with any of the services to be rendered by a bank, trust company, or banking or financial institution as to the custody and safekeeping of its municipal bonds or investments, require security in the form of collateral bonds, surety agreements, or security agreements in such form and amount as, in the opinion of the bond bank authority, is necessary or desirable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 52 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.120. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.130.
Effect of obligations.

Bonds and notes issued under this chapter are not a debt or liability of the state and do not create or constitute an indebtedness, liability, or obligation of the state, nor do they constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of the state. All bonds and notes issued under this chapter, unless funded or refunded by bonds or notes of the bond bank authority, are general obligations of the authority to which the full faith and credit of the authority are pledged to the payments of them, except to the extent provided by the resolution authorizing the issuance of them. Each bond and note must contain on its face a statement to the effect that the bond bank authority is obligated to pay the principal and interest on the instrument only from revenues or funds of the bond bank authority and that the state is not obligated to pay the principal or interest and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bond or note.

The state pledges to and agrees with the holders of the bonds or notes issued under this chapter that the state will not limit or restrict the rights vested in the bond bank authority to purchase, acquire, hold, sell, or dispose of municipal bonds or other investments or to make loans to political subdivisions or to establish and collect fees or other charges convenient or necessary to produce sufficient revenues to meet the expenses of operation of the bond bank authority and to fulfill the terms of any agreement made with the holders of its bonds or notes or in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of the bonds or notes until the bonds or notes, together with the interest on the bonds or notes, and interest on unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met, paid and discharged.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.130. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.140.
Negotiability of bonds or notes.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, a bond or note issued under this chapter is fully negotiable for all purposes of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code), and a holder or owner of a bond or note, or of a coupon appurtenant to it, by accepting the bond, note, or coupon is conclusively considered to have agreed that the bond, note, or coupon is fully negotiable for all purposes of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.140. Renumbered in 1980. In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 44.85.150.
Bonds or notes as legal investments.

Notwithstanding the restrictions of any other law, all banks, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, may legally invest sinking funds, money, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in bonds or notes issued under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.150. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.160.
Tax exemption.

All property of the bond bank authority is public property devoted to an essential public and governmental function and purpose and is exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the state or a political subdivision of the state.
All bonds or notes issued under this chapter are issued by a body corporate and public of this state and for an essential public and governmental purpose and the bonds and notes, and the interest and income on and from the bonds and notes, and all fees, charges, funds, revenues, income, and other money pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of the bonds or notes, or interest on the bonds or notes, are exempt from taxation except for transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.160. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.85.170.
Loans to political subdivisions and joint insurance arrangements.

The bond bank authority, to carry out the purposes and policies of this chapter, may lend money to municipalities through the purchase by the bond bank authority of municipal bonds of municipalities and if the purpose of the loan is to provide financing for a municipal self-insurance program and the loan meets the credit standards of the bond bank authority, may lend money to municipalities, or municipal joint insurance arrangements organized under AS 21.76. Notwithstanding a home rule charter provision requiring public sale by a municipality of its municipal bonds, a municipality may sell its municipal bonds to the bond bank authority at a negotiated, private sale. The bond bank authority, for this purpose, may issue its bonds and notes payable solely from the revenues or funds available to the bond bank authority for such payment and may otherwise assist municipalities as provided in this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent that any department or agency of the state is the custodian of money payable to a political subdivision, at any time after written notice to the department or agency head from the bond bank authority that the political subdivision is in default on the payment of principal or interest on municipal bonds then held or owned by the bond bank authority, or amounts due under an agreement between the bond bank authority and a political subdivision or a municipal joint insurance arrangement organized under AS 21.76, the department or agency shall withhold the payment of that money from that political subdivision and pay over the money to the bond bank authority for the purpose of paying principal of and interest on the bonds or debt. The notice shall be given in each instance of default.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 118 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 85 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 28 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.58.170. Renumbered in 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal bond bank authority, see 15 AAC 144.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 27, 2015, in (b), substituted “political subdivision” for “municipality” four times.